District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Department of Parks and Recreation Hours Expansion Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Division of Park Services Act of 1988, effective March 16, 1988 (D.C. Law
7-209; D.C. Official Code § 10-166) is amended by adding a new section 2b to read as follows:
“Sec. 2b. Operating hours.
“(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all facilities operated and maintained by
the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall be open for at least the following hours:
“(1) Monday through Friday, from 9 am to 9 pm;
“(2) Saturday, from 9 am to 5 pm; and


“(3) Sunday, from noon to 5pm.
“(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall establish minimum staffing levels to
ensure that the minimum operating hours set forth in subsection (a) of this section do not
adversely affect operations.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.